Mississippi, session 2026, HB1360.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. (1)  The Mississippi Department of Transportation is directed to erect signage on the segment of Interstate-22 in Marshall County, Mississippi, approaching the locations of the east and west "Exit 26" off-ramp entrances indicating the location of and directional approach to the "Marshall County Fairgrounds". (2)  The sign or signs described in subsection (1) of this section are to be erected in accordance with the Mississippi Department of Transportation's permitting process and must be paid for by Marshall County. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.